Texas, session 892, HB182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subtitle B, Title 11, Local Government Code, is amended by adding Chapter 354 to read as follows: CHAPTER 354.  COUNTY FLOOD PROTECTION Sec. 354.001.  PARTICIPATION IN STORMREADY PROGRAM. (a)  In this section, "flood prone county" means a county in which a disaster involving storms or flooding has been declared in accordance with state or federal law in the past 10 years. (b)  A flood prone county shall complete the National Weather Service StormReady program not later than the second anniversary of the date a disaster is declared involving storms or flooding affecting the county. (c)  A flood prone county shall renew the county's National Weather Service StormReady recognition every four years. SECTION 2.  Not later than the second anniversary of the effective date of this Act and notwithstanding Section 354.001, Local Government Code, as added by this Act, a county to which that section applies shall complete the National Weather Service StormReady program. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.